Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0661, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Phaseout. The credits under subdivision 2 and section 290.0671 are phased down jointly. The combined amount of the credits is reduced by 12 percent of earned income or adjusted gross income, whichever is greater, in excess of the phaseout threshold. The phaseout threshold equals: (1) deleted text begin $35,000deleted text end new text begin $63,900new text end for a married taxpayer filing a joint return; or (2) deleted text begin $29,500deleted text end new text begin $31,950new text end for all other filers. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0661, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Inflation adjustment. (a) deleted text begin For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025,deleted text end The commissioner of revenue must annually adjust for inflation the credit amount in subdivision 3 as provided in section 270C.22. The adjusted amounts must be rounded to the nearest $60. The statutory year is taxable year 2025. (b) deleted text begin For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023,deleted text end The commissioner of revenue must annually adjust for inflation the phaseout thresholds in subdivision 4, as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is taxable year deleted text begin 2023deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end